Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1401
Act, how cited.

Sections 66-1401 to 66-1428 shall be known and may be cited as the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 22;

Laws 1998, LB 1056, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 983, § 60;

Laws 2018, LB177, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 75.